Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-703
Tribunal of this state; support enforcement agency.

(a) The district court is the tribunal of this state.

(b) The Department of Health and Human Services is the support enforcement agency of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 3.